Hawaii, session 2026, HB1591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there is a shortage of health care providers in the State, particularly primary care providers, which will be exacerbated by the projected retirement of current physicians, advanced practice registered nurses, pharmacists, and other health care workers. Although students are interested in pursuing careers in Hawaii's health care service industry, in-state educational institutions are constrained by the lack of clinical education sites in the State and the limited supply of qualified preceptors.  One way to encourage the participation of preceptors is to offer an income tax credit for health care professionals who serve as preceptors. The purpose of the existing healthcare preceptor tax credit is to incentivize volunteer preceptors to offer professional instruction, training, and supervision to students and residents seeking careers as health care providers in the State.  The legislature finds that although many providers have trained eligible students, modifications to the existing program will amplify the success of the program. The legislature further finds that the healthcare preceptor tax credit program has been successful in facilitating the growth of the preceptor program.  The five-year evaluation of the program found a seventy-seven per cent increase in active preceptors who taught at least one rotation, and seventy-six providers started precepting during this five-year period.  The evaluation also recommended that to improve the function of the program, additional health care provider professions that have established schools in Hawaii should be added to the tax credit eligibility, the primary care specialty requirement for preceptors should be removed, and the requirement that the preceptor credit should be only for precepting students enrolled in a primary care program should be removed. The legislature recognizes that programs training physicians, advanced practice registered nurses, and pharmacists in primary care also require training from specialty preceptors.  The legislature further recognizes that the health care workforce has shortages in professions beyond those included in the tax credit and whose workforce expansion is also limited by available preceptors, including social workers, dietitians, and physician assistants, as well as workers in high-demand specialties such as behavioral health.  As such, the healthcare preceptor tax credit should not be limited to physicians, advanced practice registered nurses, and pharmacists and should be expanded to be applied across all eligible professions.  Finally, the legislature finds that the definition of "volunteer-based supervised clinical training rotation" should be clarified to facilitate the preceptor credit assurance committee's implementation of the tax credit. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to make various amendments related to the healthcare preceptor tax credit, including: (1)  Amending the definitions of "preceptor" and "volunteer‑based supervised clinical training rotation" to improve accessibility for providers to receive income tax credits for acting as preceptors, including removing "primary care" from the criteria to qualify as a preceptor; (2)  Adding physician assistants, dieticians, and social workers to the list of preceptors and in the definition of "eligible student"; (3)  Expanding eligibility for the tax credit to include accredited residency programs that require preceptor support; and (4)  Revising the membership of the preceptor credit assurance committee to include the director of health and representatives of residency programs with eligible students. SECTION 2.  Section 235-110.25, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (g) to read as follows: "(g)  For the purposes of this section: "Academic program" means an academic degree granting program or graduate medical education program that: (1)  Holds either its principal accreditation or a physical location in Hawaii; and (2)  Provides education to students, of whom more than fifty per cent are residents of Hawaii. "Advanced practice registered nurse student" means an individual participating in a nationally accredited academic program that is for the education of advanced practice registered nurses and recognized by the state board of nursing pursuant to chapter 457. "Dietitian student" means an individual participating in an academic program that is nationally accredited for the training of individuals to become licensed dietitians pursuant to chapter 448B. "Eligible professional degree or training certificate" means a degree or certificate that fulfills a requirement to be a physician or osteopathic physician, pursuant to chapter 453[,]; a physician assistant, pursuant to chapter 453; an advanced practice registered nurse, pursuant to chapter 457[, or]; a pharmacist, pursuant to chapter 461[.]; a dietitian, pursuant to chapter 448B; or a social worker, pursuant to chapter 467E. "Eligible student" means an advanced practice registered nurse student, medical student,[or] pharmacy student, physician assistant student, dietitian student, or social work student, or resident, who is enrolled in an eligible academic program[.], residency program, or fellowship. "Medical student" means an individual participating in a nationally accredited academic program leading to the medical doctor or doctor of osteopathy degree.  "Medical student" includes graduates from nationally accredited academic programs who have continued their training, in the role of resident or fellow, to obtain the additional qualifications needed for medical licensure, pursuant to chapter 453, or specialty certification. "Nationally accredited" means holding an institutional accreditation by name to offer post-secondary medical [primary care] education. For purposes of this definition, accreditation shall be offered by the following institutions or bodies, or any other accreditation body recognized by the preceptor credit assurance committee: (1)  Accreditation for medical students shall be offered by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education or American Osteopathic Association Commission on Osteopathic College Accreditation[.]; (2)  Accreditation for advanced practice registered nurse students shall be offered by the Commission on Collegiate Nursing Education[.]; (3)  Accreditation for nursing residency programs shall be offered by the Commission on Collegiate Nursing Education, American Nurses Credentialing Center, or Consortium for Advanced Practice Providers; (4)  Accreditation for pharmacy students shall be offered by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education; (5)  Accreditation for pharmacy residency programs shall be offered by the American Society of Health-System Pharmacists; (6)  Accreditation for physician assistant students shall be offered by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the Physician Assistant, Inc.; (7)  Accreditation for physician assistant residency programs shall be offered by the Consortium for Advanced Practice Providers or Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the Physician Assistant, Inc.; (8)  Accreditation for dietitian students shall be offered by the Accreditation Council for Education in Nutrition and Dietetics; and (9)  Accreditation for social work students shall be offered by the Council on Social Work Education. New or additional accreditation bodies may be eligible; provided that they are recognized by the preceptor credit assurance committee. "Pharmacy student" means an individual participating in an academic program that is nationally accredited for the training of individuals to become registered pharmacists pursuant to chapter 461. "Physician assistant student" means an individual participating in an academic program that is nationally accredited for the education of physician assistants to become a nationally certified and licensed physician assistant pursuant to section 453-5.3. "Preceptor" means a physician or osteopathic physician, licensed pursuant to chapter 453[,]; a physician assistant, licensed pursuant to chapter 453; an advanced practice registered nurse, licensed pursuant to chapter 457[, or]; a pharmacist, licensed pursuant to chapter 461[,]; a dietitian, licensed pursuant to chapter 448B; or a social worker, licensed pursuant to chapter 467E, who is a resident of Hawaii [and who], maintains a professional [primary care] practice in [this] the State[.], and whose specialty supports the development and training of an eligible student for clinical health care practice. ["Primary care" means the principal point of continuing care for patients provided by a healthcare provider, including health promotion, disease prevention, health maintenance, counseling, patient education, diagnosis and treatment of acute and chronic illnesses, and coordination of other specialist care that the patient may need.] "Residency program" means a residency or fellowship program that provides continuing training for eligible professions, in the role of resident or fellow, to obtain the additional qualifications that support professional practice.  "Residency program" includes programs offered through employers or nationally accredited academic programs. "Social work student" means an individual participating in an academic program that is nationally accredited for the training of individuals to become a social worker licensed pursuant to chapter 467E. "Volunteer-based supervised clinical training rotation" means [an uncompensated] a period of supervised clinical training [of] to an eligible student that totals at least eighty hours of supervisory time annually, in which a preceptor provides personalized instruction, training, and supervision to an eligible student to enable the eligible student to obtain an eligible professional degree or training certificate[.]; provided that while a preceptor may be compensated for providing standard clinical services, the preceptor shall be uncompensated for: (1)  Clinical training above or beyond clinical salary or reimbursements for clinical services; and (2)  Provision of clinical training services from tuition funds or from state general funds." SECTION 3.  Section 321-2.7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1. By amending subsections (a) and (b) to read: "(a)  There is established the preceptor credit assurance committee within the department of health. The committee shall develop and implement a plan for certifying healthcare preceptor tax credits under section 235-110.25, including: (1)  Developing a process ensuring that requests for credit certification are reviewed and verifications are processed no later than thirty days following the close of each calendar year; and (2)  Developing the documentation process for the committee to certify a preceptor for the tax credit; provided that the documentation to be collected shall include: (A)  The preceptor's name, address, place of practice, and Hawaii provider license number; (B)  Dates and hours of volunteer-based supervised clinical training rotation per eligible student; (C)  Attestation that the preceptor is uncompensated for the volunteer-based supervised clinical training rotation; [and] provided further that if the preceptor is compensated for providing standard clinical services, attestation that the preceptor is uncompensated for: (i)  Clinical training above or beyond clinical salary or reimbursements for clinical services; and (ii)  Provision of clinical training services from tuition funds or from state general funds; and (D)  Other information deemed necessary by the committee. (b)  The committee shall be composed of [representatives of]: (1)  [The Hawaii/Pacific basin area health education center;] The director of health, or the director's designee; and (2)  [The center for nursing; and] Representatives of: (A)  The Hawaii/Pacific basin area health education center; (B)  The center for nursing; (C)  Academic programs with eligible students; and (D)  Residency programs with eligible students. [(3)  Academic programs with eligible students.]" 2. By amending subsection (e) to read: "(e)  As used in this section, "academic program", "eligible student", "preceptor", "residency program", and "volunteer-based supervised clinical training rotation" shall have the same meanings as in section 235-110.25." SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050; provided that sections 2 and 3 shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026.